Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3011
No preclusion from receiving tax
incentives or other benefits.

Participation in the Teleworker Job Creation Act shall not
preclude an employer from receiving tax incentives or other benefits under
other federal, state, or local incentive programs.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 11.